Utah statutes.
59-1-211.   Uniform system of accounts.

(1)  The commission shall establish a uniform system of accounts and when established it shall be followed by all taxing entities within the state.

(2)  The commission may make rules directly relating to the administration of a uniform system of accounts and shall periodically publish these rules and distribute them to all taxing entities.

(3)  The commission shall certify a list of all taxing entities that do not comply with the laws and rules pertaining to uniform accounts to the county attorney of the county in which the entity is located.  The county attorney shall immediately notify the official or officials charged by law with complying with them.  If the official or officials fail to so comply within 60 days after receipt of the notice, the county attorney shall commence proceedings in district court in mandamus to require performance.



Amended by Chapter 3, 1988 General Session

